North Carolina, session 2025, SB376.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of the
State Auditor the following sums for the 2025-2026 fiscal year:
(1) Personnel expansion. – Ninety-five thousand dollars ($95,000) in
nonrecurring funds for initial onboarding and recruitment costs for the
positions being added under subdivision (b)(1) of this section.
(2) Contract funding. – Three million dollars ($3,000,000) in nonrecurring funds
to support critical short-term audit infrastructure.
(3) Construction needs. – One million dollars ($1,000,000) in nonrecurring funds
for additional office space.
SECTION 1.(b) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of the
State Auditor the following sums for each year of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium:
(1) Personnel expansion. – Six million seven hundred thousand dollars
($6,700,000) in recurring funds to hire 70 additional full-time staff positions.
(2) Staff compensation increase. – Five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) in
recurring funds to provide a three percent (3%) increase in staff compensation
for recruitment and retention.
*S376-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(3) Data analytics and technology upgrades. – Five million dollars ($5,000,000)
in recurring funds for information technology modernization and security
upgrades for audit infrastructure.
SECTION 2. By December 31, 2025, the State Auditor shall submit a report to the
Joint Legislative Commission on Governmental Operations detailing the use of these funds,
including the number of audits conducted, findings related to fraud or financial mismanagement,
and the impact of technology investments on audit efficiency.
SECTION 3. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
Page 2 Senate Bill 376-First Edition